Maine, session 132, LD1737.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11154, sub-§14, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2013, c. 538, §24, is
amended to read:
A. For the purposes of this subsection, "hunting outfitter" means a person who operates
a sporting camp as defined under Title 22, section 2491, subsection 11 that is licensed
under Title 22, chapter 562 and who provides package deals that include food, lodging
and the services of a guide licensed under chapter 927 for the purpose of hunting
commercial sporting camp as defined under Title 22, section 2491, subsection 2-C that
is licensed under Title 22, chapter 562 and who provides the services of a guide
licensed under chapter 927 for the purpose of hunting.
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §2491, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Commercial sporting camp. "Commercial sporting camp" means a building or
group of buildings devoted primarily to the offering of lodging, meals, equipment and
professional guide services for a fee to persons engaged in hunting, fishing or
snowmobiling if the commercial sporting camp:
A. Is located in an unorganized territory, abuts an unorganized territory in the State or
is in a municipality or other organized territory of less than 1,500 residents;
B. Has a caretaker present on site or nearby;
C. Does not operate primarily to serve day visitors;
D. Is not a hotel, motel, bed and breakfast, campground, children's camp or educational
camp or a housekeeping cabin that is not qualified to serve meals;
E. Is open to the public and is not restricted to members only;
F. Is not organized as a nonprofit organization;
G. Is authorized to collect sales tax pursuant to Title 36; and
H. Does not primarily solicit reservations on electronic platforms for short-term rentals.
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §2492, sub-§1, ¶D-1 is enacted to read:
D-1. A commercial sporting camp pursuant to section 2495-A;
Sec. 4. 22 MRSA §2494, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 125, §11, is further
amended to read:
Each application for, or for renewal of, a license to operate an eating establishment,
lodging place, recreational camp, commercial sporting camp, youth camp, public pool,
public spa or campground within the meaning of this chapter must be accompanied by a
fee, appropriate to the size of the establishment, place, camp, pool, spa or area of the
licensee, determined by the department and not to exceed the fees listed below. All fees
collected by the department must be deposited into a special revenue account established
for this purpose. No such fee may be refunded. No license may be assignable or
transferable. The fees may not exceed:
Sec. 5. 22 MRSA §2495, first ¶, as amended by PL 2021, c. 125, §13, is further
amended to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2368(01)

The department shall, within 30 days following receipt of a complete application, issue
an annual license to operate any eating establishment, lodging place, recreational camp,
commercial sporting camp, youth camp, campground, public pool or public spa that is
found to comply with this chapter and the rules adopted by the department.
Sec. 6. 22 MRSA §2495-A is enacted to read:
§2495-A. Commercial sporting camp license
Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the department shall
issue a license to a commercial sporting camp in accordance with the following
requirements.
1. Other laws of State. The department may not require as a condition of licensing
an applicant for a commercial sporting camp license to demonstrate compliance with any
other laws of the State except for compliance with the requirements of this chapter.
2. Sprinkler system, plumbing and septic system requirements. The department
may not require as a condition of licensing a commercial sporting camp located in an area
without a municipal water supply to:
A. Install a sprinkler system in any buildings; or
B. Upgrade or make changes to any plumbing or septic system as long as the current
plumbing and septic system is operational.
3. Transfer of license. A license issued to a commercial sporting camp transfers to
the new owner following the sale of the commercial sporting camp without additional
requirements for licensing as long as the new owner otherwise meets the requirements for
licensing.
4. Food service. A commercial sporting camp must qualify to serve meals to persons
lodging at the commercial sporting camp, and a commercial sporting camp may not be
prohibited from serving or catering meals to the general public if the commercial sporting
camp meets the requirements of a Class A restaurant.
5. Additional penalty. In addition to any penalties provided in section 2498 that the
department may impose, an applicant that misrepresents its qualifications for a license as a
commercial sporting camp under section 2491, subsection 2-C or this section commits a
Class E crime.
Sec. 7. 22 MRSA §2498, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2017, c. 322, §7, is further
amended to read:
A. The department may impose penalties for violations of this chapter, or the rules
adopted pursuant to this chapter, on any eating establishment, lodging place,
recreational camp, commercial sporting camp, youth camp, public pool or public spa
or campground. The penalties may not be greater than $100 for each violation. Each
day that the violation remains uncorrected may be counted as a separate offense.
Penalties may be imposed for each violation of the rules.
Sec. 8. 22 MRSA §2498, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2017, c. 322, §7, is further
amended to read:
B. The department may direct an eating establishment, lodging place, recreational
camp, commercial sporting camp, youth camp, public pool or public spa or
Page 2 - 132LR2368(01)

413 campground to correct any violations in a manner and within a time frame that the
424 department determines is appropriate to ensure compliance with state rules or to protect
435 the public health. Failure to correct violations within the time frames constitutes a
446 separate finable violation.
Sec. 9. 22 MRSA §2498, sub-§1, ¶C, as amended by PL 2021, c. 125, §14, is
further amended to read:
C. The department may impose penalties up to $5,000 on any person, corporation, firm
or copartnership that operates any eating establishment, lodging place, recreational
camp, commercial sporting camp, youth camp, public pool or public spa or
campground without an active, valid license, as determined by the department. Each
day any such person, corporation, firm or copartnership operates without an active,
valid license constitutes a separate offense.